Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB732.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Hiring party" means a person who hires or enters into a contract with a
self-employed worker;
(b) "Portable benefit plan" means a benefit plan that is provided by a third-
party insurance provider chosen by a self-employed worker and assigned to
a beneficiary rather than to an employer or hiring party, including but not
limited to:
1. Health insurance;
2. Unemployment insurance;
3. Disability insurance;
4. Workers' compensation;
5. Life insurance; or
6. Retirement benefits; and
(c) "Self-employed worker" means a person who earns his or her living from
an independent pursuit of economic activities, rather than from a separate
company or individual.
(2) A public or private entity, including an internet or application-based company,
may voluntarily contribute funds to a portable benefit plan as a form of
compensation to a self-employed worker.
(3) Contributions to a portable benefit plan shall not be used as criterion for
determining a worker's employment classification.
Page 1 of 1
BR213400.100 - 2134 - XXXX 3/24/2026 2:48 PM Jacketed